Illinois, session 104th, HB5666.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 8ordinary and contingent expenses of the Illinois Law 9Enforcement Training Standards Board:10OPERATIONS11Payable from the Law Enforcement Training Fund:12  For payment of and/or reimbursement of basic training and13   basic training services in accordance with statutory14   provisions......................................18,500,00015  For payment of and/or reimbursement of in-service training16   services in accordance with statutory17   provisions......................................24,191,00018  For Personal Services.............................9,115,30019  For State Contributions to State Employees' Retirement20   System...........................................3,961,10021  For State Contributions to Social Security..........693,20022  For Group Insurance...............................2,604,80023  For Contractual Services..........................4,300,000  HB5666- 2 -OMB104 00260 JCS 10260 b1  For Travel..........................................125,0002  For Commodities.....................................100,0003  For Printing........................................100,0004  For Equipment.......................................800,0005  For Electronic Data Processing....................1,435,0006  For Telecommunication Services......................375,0007  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................167,5008    Total                                         $66,467,900 9    Section 10. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Law Enforcement 11Camera Grant Fund to the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 12Standards Board for grants to units of local government in 13Illinois related to installing video cameras in law 14enforcement vehicles, training law enforcement officers in the 15operation of the cameras, and expenses related to data storage 16and related licensing costs, in accordance with statutory 17provisions of the Law Enforcement Camera Grant Act. 18    Section 15. The sum of $54,820,010, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 20business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation heretofore 21made for such purposes in Article 93, Section 15 of Public Act 22104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Law 23Enforcement Camera Grant Fund to the Illinois Law Enforcement 24Training Standards Board for grants to units of local   HB5666- 3 -OMB104 00260 JCS 10260 b1government in Illinois related to installing video cameras in 2law enforcement vehicles, training law enforcement officers in 3the operation of the cameras, and expenses related to data 4storage and related licensing costs, in accordance with 5statutory provisions of the Law Enforcement Camera Grant Act. 6    Section 20. The following named amount, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 8purposes hereinafter named, is appropriated to the Illinois 9Law Enforcement Training Standards Board as follows:10GRANTS-IN-AID11Payable from the Traffic and Criminal 12 Conviction Surcharge Fund:13  For payment of and/or reimbursement14   of basic training and basic training services15   in accordance with statutory provisions..........3,000,00016  For payment of and/or reimbursement17   of in-service training and in-service training services18   in accordance with statutory provisions..........5,000,000 19    Section 25. The sum of $8,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Law Enforcement 21Officers Training Board Federal Projects Fund to the Illinois 22Law Enforcement Training Standards Board for expenses relating 23to various federal projects. 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1,   HB5666- 4 -OMB104 00260 JCS 10260 b12026.